California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 the summary, upon request, to physicians and surgeons. The Medical Board of California shall make the summary available for a fee not exceeding, in the aggregate, the actual costs to the State Department of Health Services and the Medical Board of California for developing, updating, publishing, and distributing the summary. A physician and surgeon performing surgical procedures described in subdivision (a) shall purchase the summary from the Medical Board of California for distribution to his or her patients, as required in this section. Any person or entity may purchase the summary if he, she, or it desires. The Medical Board of California shall fund the State Department of Health Services for the actual cost of developing and updating the summary incurred by the State Department of Health Services, through an interagency agreement entered into between the Medical Board of California and the State Department of Health Services.

The Medical Board of California and
 the State Department of Health Services may distribute the written information described in subdivision (a) if a manufacturer of collagen provides the board and state department with a sufficient number of copies of this information, as determined by the state department.

(h) Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(i) For purposes of this section, “collagen” includes, but is not limited to, any substance derived from animal protein, or combined with animal protein, that is implanted into the body for purposes of cosmetic, plastic, reconstructive, or similar surgery. However, “collagen” does not include absorbable gelatin medical devices intended for application to bleeding surfaces as a hemostatic or any other medical device used for purposes other than beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance of any part of the human body.

(j) A physician and surgeon shall not be responsible for complying with this section until the written summary is published pursuant to subdivision (g).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2259.7.

The Medical Board of California shall adopt extraction and postoperative care standards in regard to body liposuction procedures performed by a physician and surgeon outside of a general acute care hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code. In adopting those regulations, the Medical Board of California shall take into account the most current clinical and scientific information available. A violation of those extraction and postoperative care standards constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 631, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2259.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an elective cosmetic surgery procedure may not be performed on a patient unless the patient has received, within 30 days prior to the elective cosmetic surgery procedure, and confirmed as up-to-date on the day of the procedure, an appropriate physical examination by, and written clearance for the procedure from, any of the following:

(1) The physician and
 surgeon who will be performing the surgery.

(2) Another licensed physician and surgeon.

(3) A certified nurse practitioner, in accordance with a certified nurse practitioner’s scope of practice, unless limited by protocols or a delegation agreement.

(4) A licensed physician assistant, in accordance with a licensed physician assistant’s scope of practice, unless limited by protocols or a delegation agreement.

(b) The physical examination described in subdivision (a) shall include the taking of an appropriate medical history.

(c) An appropriate medical history and physical examination done on the day of the procedure shall be presumed to be in compliance with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) “Elective cosmetic surgery” means an elective surgery that is performed to alter or reshape normal structures of the body in order to improve the patient’s appearance, including, but not limited to, liposuction and elective facial cosmetic surgery.

(e) Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2260.

(a) A physician and surgeon who removes sperm or ova from a patient shall, before the sperm or ova are used for a purpose other than reimplantation in the same patient or implantation in the spouse of the patient, obtain the written consent of the patient as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The consent required by subdivision (a) shall conform to all of the following requirements:

(1) The consent shall be in writing
 and shall contain the following statement: I (name of donor) do hereby donate (type and number, if applicable, of sperm or ova), to (name of clinic or other donee) for (specify purpose).

(2) The consent shall contain a statement by the donor that specifies the disposition of any unused donated material.

(3) The consent shall be signed by the patient and by the physician and surgeon who removes the sperm or ova.

(4) The physician and surgeon shall retain the original consent in the medical record of the patient and give a copy of the consent to the patient.

(5) The consent shall contain a notification to the patient that the written consent is an important document that should be retained with other vital records.

(6) If the procedure to remove the sperm or ova is performed in a hospital, the physician and surgeon shall provide a copy of the consent to the hospital.

(c) Nothing in this section shall affect the obligation of a physician and surgeon under current law to obtain the informed consent of a patient before performing a medical procedure on the patient that may significantly affect the patient’s reproductive health or ability to conceive, or both.

(d) A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct. Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(e) A physician and surgeon who fails, for the second time, to obtain any consent required in subdivision (a) or (b) before transferring sperm or ova from a provider of sperm or ova to a recipient,
 shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the individual whose required consent was not obtained. A separate penalty shall be assessed for each individual from whom the consent was not obtained. The penalties in this section shall be available in addition to any other remedies that may be available under other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2260.5.

A violation of Section 24185 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to human cloning, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 821, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2261.

Knowingly making or signing any certificate or other document directly or indirectly related to the practice of medicine or podiatry which falsely represents the existence or nonexistence of a state of facts, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2262.

Altering or modifying the medical record of any person, with fraudulent intent, or creating any false medical record, with fraudulent intent, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

In addition to any other disciplinary action, the Division of Medical Quality or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine may impose a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.

The willful, unauthorized violation of professional confidence constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2264.

The employing, directly or indirectly, the aiding, or the abetting of any unlicensed person or any suspended, revoked, or unlicensed practitioner to engage in the practice of medicine or any other mode of treating the sick or afflicted which requires a license to practice constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.

The failure of a physician and surgeon to maintain adequate and accurate records relating to the provision of services to their patients for at least seven years after the last date of service to a patient constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 18.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.

Any advertising in violation of Section 17500, relating to false or misleading advertising, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2272.

Any advertising of the practice of medicine in which the licensee fails to use his or her own name or approved fictitious name constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2273.

(a) Except as otherwise allowed by law, the employment of runners, cappers, steerers, or other persons to procure patients constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(b) A licensee shall have the licensee’s license revoked for a period of 10 years, or shall stipulate to surrender of the license for 10 years, upon a second conviction for violating any of the following provisions or upon being convicted of more than one count of violating any of the following provisions in a single case: Section 650 of this code, Section 750 or 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, or Section 549 or 550 of the Penal Code. After the expiration of this 10-year period, an application for license reinstatement may be made pursuant to Section
 2307.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 20.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2274.

(a) The use by any licensee of any certificate, of any letter, letters, word, words, term, or terms either as a prefix, affix, or suffix indicating that he or she is entitled to engage in a medical practice for which he or she is not licensed constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a physician and surgeon from using the designations specified in this section if he or she has been issued a retired license under Section
 2439.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2275.

Any person who held a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate under the jurisdiction of the Osteopathic Medical Board of California and a degree of doctor of medicine issued by a medical school located in the state at any time prior to September 30, 1962, and approved by either the Osteopathic Medical Board of California or the Medical Board of California at the time such degree was issued, who applied in writing to the Medical Board of California for permission to utilize his or her degree of doctor of medicine, shall be authorized to use the term or suffix “M.D.” and the use shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, so long as the person advised both
 boards, in writing, that he or she has elected to use the term or suffix “M.D.” and further has elected not to use the term or suffix “D.O.” In the event of such election, the use of the term or suffix “D.O.” constitutes unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 11.7.)
-------------------------------------------

2276.

Unless the holder of any certificate provided for in this chapter has been granted the degree of doctor of osteopathy after the completion of a full course of study as prescribed by an approved osteopathic medical school in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the use of the term or suffix “D.O.” constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2277.

Unless the holder of any certificate provided for in this chapter has been granted the degree of doctor of podiatric medicine after the completion of a full course of study as prescribed by a school or college of podiatric medicine in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the use of the term or suffix “D.P.M.” constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2278.

Unless a person authorized under this chapter to use the title “doctor” or the letters or prefix “Dr.” holds a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate, the use of such title, letters, or prefix without further indicating the type of certificate held, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2280.

No licensee shall practice medicine while under the influence of any narcotic drug or alcohol to such an extent as to impair his or her ability to conduct the practice of medicine with safety to the public and his or her patients. Violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct and is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2281.

A physician and surgeon or a student undertaking a course of professional instruction or a clinical training program, may not perform a pelvic examination on an anesthetized or unconscious female patient unless the patient gave informed consent to the pelvic examination, or the performance of a pelvic examination is within the scope of care for the surgical procedure or diagnostic examination to be performed on the patient or, in the case of an unconscious patient, the pelvic examination is required for diagnostic purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 644, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.

The regular practice of medicine in a licensed general or specialized hospital having five or more physicians and surgeons on the medical staff, which does not have rules established by the board of directors thereof to govern the operation of the hospital, which rules include, among other provisions, all the following, constitutes unprofessional conduct:

(a) Provision for the organization of physicians and surgeons licensed to practice in this state who are permitted to practice in the hospital into a formal medical staff with appropriate officers and bylaws and with staff appointments on an
 annual or biennial basis.

(b) Provision that membership on the medical staff shall be restricted to physicians and surgeons and other licensed practitioners competent in their respective fields and worthy in professional ethics. In this respect the division of profits from professional fees in any manner shall be prohibited and any such division shall be cause for exclusion from the staff.

(c) Provision that the medical staff shall be self-governing with respect to the professional work performed in the hospital; that the medical staff shall meet periodically and review and analyze at regular intervals their clinical experience; and the medical records of patients shall be the basis for such review and analysis.

(d) Provision that adequate and accurate medical records be prepared and maintained for all
 patients.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.5.

(a) The medical staff’s right of self-governance shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Establishing, in medical staff bylaws, rules, or regulations, criteria and standards, consistent with Article 11 (commencing with Section 800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2, for medical staff membership and privileges, and enforcing those criteria and
 standards.

(2) Establishing, in medical staff bylaws, rules, or regulations, clinical criteria and standards to oversee and manage quality assurance, utilization review, and other medical staff activities including, but not limited to, periodic meetings of the medical staff and its committees and departments and review and analysis of patient medical records.

(3) Selecting and removing medical staff officers.

(4) Assessing medical staff dues and utilizing the medical staff dues as appropriate for the purposes of the medical staff.

(5) The ability to retain and be represented by independent legal counsel at the expense of the medical staff.

(6) Initiating, developing, and adopting medical
 staff bylaws, rules, and regulations, and amendments thereto, subject to the approval of the hospital governing board, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(b) The medical staff bylaws shall not interfere with the independent rights of the medical staff to do any of the following, but shall set forth the procedures for:

(1) Selecting and removing medical staff officers.

(2) Assessing medical staff dues and utilizing the medical staff dues as appropriate for the purposes of the medical staff.

(3) The ability to retain and be represented by independent legal counsel at the expense of the medical staff.

(c) With respect to any dispute arising under this section, the medical
 staff and the hospital governing board shall meet and confer in good faith to resolve the dispute. Whenever any person or entity has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that hinder, restrict, or otherwise obstruct the ability of the medical staff to exercise its rights, obligations, or responsibilities under this section, the superior court of any county, on application of the medical staff, and after determining that reasonable efforts, including reasonable administrative remedies provided in the medical staff bylaws, rules, or regulations, have failed to resolve the dispute, may issue an injunction, writ of mandate, or other appropriate order. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.   See similar section added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 848.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.5.

(a) The medical staff’s right of
 self-governance shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Establishing, in medical staff bylaws, rules, or regulations, criteria and standards, consistent with Article 11 (commencing with Section 800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2, for medical staff membership and privileges, and enforcing those criteria and standards.

(2) Establishing, in medical staff bylaws, rules, or regulations, clinical criteria and standards to oversee and manage quality assurance, utilization review, and other medical staff activities including, but not limited to, periodic meetings of the medical staff and its committees and departments and review and analysis of patient medical records.

(3) Selecting and removing medical staff officers.

(4) Assessing medical
 staff dues and utilizing the medical staff dues as appropriate for the purposes of the medical staff.

(5) The ability to retain and be represented by independent legal counsel at the expense of the medical staff, provided that medical staff at the University of California have the right to retain and be represented by independent legal counsel at the expense of the medical staff upon approval by the Regents of the University of California or their designee in accordance with the bylaws of the Regents, which approval shall not be unreasonably denied.

(6) Initiating, developing, and adopting medical staff bylaws, rules, and regulations, and amendments thereto, subject to the approval of the hospital governing board, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(b) The medical staff bylaws shall not interfere with
 the independent rights of the medical staff to do any of the following, but shall set forth the procedures for:

(1) Selecting and removing medical staff officers.

(2) Assessing medical staff dues and utilizing the medical staff dues as appropriate for the purposes of the medical staff.

(3) The ability to retain and be represented by independent legal counsel at the expense of the medical staff.

(c) With respect to any dispute arising under this section, the medical staff and the hospital governing board shall meet and confer in good faith to resolve the dispute. Whenever any person or entity has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that hinder, restrict, or otherwise obstruct the ability of the medical staff to exercise its rights,
 obligations, or responsibilities under this section, the superior court of any county, on application of the medical staff, and after determining that reasonable efforts, including reasonable administrative remedies provided in the medical staff bylaws, rules, or regulations, have failed to resolve the dispute, may issue an injunction, writ of mandate, or other appropriate order. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 848, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2283.

The regular practice of medicine in a licensed general or specialized hospital having less than five physicians and surgeons on the medical staff, which does not have rules established by the board of directors thereof to govern the operation of the hospital, which rules include, among other provisions, all of the following, constitutes unprofessional conduct:

(a) Provision that membership on the medical staff shall be restricted to physicians and surgeons and other licensed practitioners competent in their respective fields and worthy in professional ethics. In this respect the division of
 profits for professional fees in any manner shall be prohibited and any such division shall be cause for exclusion from the staff.

(b) Provision that adequate and accurate medical records be prepared and maintained for all patients.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2284.

(a) A licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed podiatrist, or a group of physicians and surgeons or podiatrists, or a medical or podiatry corporation shall not share in any fee charged by an acupuncturist or receive any consideration from or on behalf of such acupuncturist for any referral or diagnosis.

(b) A licensed physician and surgeon or podiatrist shall not employ more than one acupuncturist.

(c) A group of physicians and surgeons or podiatrists, or a medical or podiatry corporation, shall not employ
 more than one acupuncturist for every 20 practitioners in such group or corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2285.

The use of any fictitious, false, or assumed name, or any name other than his or her own by a licensee either alone, in conjunction with a partnership or group, or as the name of a professional corporation, in any public communication, advertisement, sign, or announcement of his or her practice without a fictitious-name permit obtained pursuant to Section 2415 constitutes unprofessional conduct. This section shall not apply to the following:

(a) Licensees who are employed by a partnership, a group, or
 a professional corporation that holds a fictitious name permit.

(b) Licensees who contract with, are employed by, or are on the staff of, any clinic licensed by the State Department of Health Services under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) An outpatient surgery setting granted a certificate of accreditation from an accreditation agency approved by the medical board.

(d) Any medical school approved by the division or a faculty practice plan connected with the medical school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2286.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct for any licensee to violate, to attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, to assist in or abet the violation of, or to conspire to violate any provision or term of Article 18 (commencing with Section 2400), of the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or of any rules and regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2287.

The purchase, sale, or barter, or offering to purchase, sell, or barter any medical or podiatric degree, or any degree, diploma, certificate, affidavit, transcript, or other evidence made or purporting to be made, pursuant to any laws regulating the licensure of persons under this chapter, or any preceding medical practice act or for use in connection with the granting of any certificates or diplomas or the purchase, procurement, or altering in any material regard, with fraudulent intent, a diploma, certificate, affidavit, transcript, or other evidence required for issuing any certificate or diploma that has been purchased, fraudulently issued, counterfeited,
 or materially altered constitutes unprofessional conduct. The attempt to or conspiring to violate this section also constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2288.

The impersonation of any applicant or acting as proxy for any applicant in any examination required under this chapter for a certificate constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2289.

The impersonation of another licensed practitioner or permitting or allowing another person to use his or her certificate to engage in the practice of medicine or podiatric medicine constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2290.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 580) of Chapter 1, relating to frauds of medical records, degrees, diplomas, certificates, and transcripts are not affected by the provisions of this article and, so far as any act is a crime within their scope, such provisions control over the provisions of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2290.5.

(a) For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Asynchronous store and forward” means the transmission of a patient’s medical information from an originating site to the health care provider at a distant site.

(2) “Distant site” means a site where a health care provider who provides health care services is located while providing these services via a telecommunications system.

(3) “Health care provider” means any of the following:

(A) A person who is licensed under this division.

(B) An associate marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist trainee functioning pursuant to Section 4980.43.3.

(C) A qualified autism service provider certified by a national entity as defined in Section 4999.200 or a qualified autism service professional as defined in Section 4999.201.

(D) An associate clinical social worker functioning pursuant to Section 4996.23.2.

(E) An associate professional clinical counselor or clinical counselor trainee functioning pursuant to Section 4999.46.3.

(4) “Originating site” means a site where a patient is located at the time health care services are
 provided via a telecommunications system or where the asynchronous store and forward service originates.

(5) “Synchronous interaction” means a real-time interaction between a patient and a health care provider located at a distant site.

(6) “Telehealth” means the mode of delivering health care services and public health via information and communication technologies to facilitate the diagnosis, consultation, treatment, education, care management, and self-management of a patient’s health care. Telehealth facilitates patient self-management and caregiver support for patients and includes synchronous interactions and asynchronous store and forward transfers.

(b) Before the delivery of health care via telehealth, the
 health care provider initiating the use of telehealth shall inform the patient about the use of telehealth and obtain verbal or written consent from the patient for the use of telehealth as an acceptable mode of delivering health care services and public health. The consent shall be documented.

(c) This section does not preclude a patient from receiving in-person health care delivery services during a specified course of health care and treatment after agreeing to receive services via telehealth.

(d) The failure of a health care provider to comply with this section shall constitute unprofessional conduct. Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(e) This section does not alter the scope of practice of a health care
 provider or authorize the delivery of health care services in a setting, or in a manner, not otherwise authorized by law.

(f) All laws regarding the confidentiality of health care information and a patient’s rights to the patient’s medical information shall apply to telehealth interactions.

(g) All laws and regulations governing professional responsibility, unprofessional conduct, and standards of practice that apply to a health care provider under the health care provider’s license shall apply to that health care provider while providing telehealth services.

(h) This section shall not apply to a patient under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or any other correctional facility.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other law and for purposes of this section, the governing body of the hospital whose patients are receiving the telehealth services may grant privileges to, and verify and approve credentials for, providers of telehealth services based on its medical staff recommendations that rely on information provided by the distant-site hospital or telehealth entity, as described in Sections 482.12, 482.22, and 485.616 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) By enacting this subdivision, it is the intent of the Legislature to authorize a hospital to grant privileges to, and verify and approve credentials for, providers of telehealth services as described in paragraph (1).

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “telehealth” shall include “telemedicine” as the term is referenced in Sections 482.12, 482.22, and 485.616 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2291.

It is unprofessional conduct for any licensee not a member or authorized official of the board, or of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine in the case of a doctor of podiatric medicine, to sign or issue or cause to be signed or issued any certificate authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2292.

(a) A licensee may be ordered to undergo a professional competency examination if, after investigation and review by a medical expert designated by the division or the Board of Podiatric Medicine, as applicable, there is reasonable cause to believe that the licensee is unable to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients. Reasonable cause shall be demonstrated by one or more of the following: (1) a single incident of gross negligence; (2) a pattern of inappropriate prescribing; (3) an act of incompetence or negligence
 causing death or serious bodily injury; or (4) a pattern of substandard care.

(b) The results of a competency examination shall be admissible as direct evidence and may be considered relevant in any subsequent disciplinary or interim proceeding against the licensee taking it, and, assuming it is determined to be relevant, shall be considered together with other relevant evidence in making a final determination.

(c) Upon referral from the division, the matter shall be drafted and presented by the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section or his or her designee by way of a written petition detailing the reasonable cause. The petition shall contain all conclusions and facts upon which the presumption of reasonable cause is based. A copy of the petition shall be served on the physician who shall have the opportunity to file written opposition to the
 petition within 30 days after service. Service of the petition and any orders shall be in accordance with the methods of service authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code.

(d) A panel of the division shall review the petition and any opposition paper from the physician, or the panel of the division, or an administrative law judge to whom the petition is assigned by the division, may hold a hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act to determine if reasonable cause exists, as specified in subdivision (a). The physician shall have the right to be represented at that hearing by the person of his or her choice. If the panel of the division or administrative law judge is satisfied that reasonable cause exists as to the circumstances specified in subdivision (a), the division or panel shall issue an order compelling the physician to undergo an examination of professional competency as
 measured by community standards. For purposes of this section, “community standards” means the statewide standards of the community of licensees. Failure to comply with the order duly served on the physician shall constitute unprofessional conduct for purposes of disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2293.

(a) The professional competency examination shall be in the form of an oral clinical examination to be administered by three physician examiners selected by the division or its designee, who shall test for medical knowledge specific to the physician’s specialty or specific suspected deficiency. The examination shall be audio recorded.

(b) A
 failing grade from two of the examiners shall constitute a failure of an examination. In the event of a failure, the board shall supply a true and correct copy of the audio recording of the examination to the unsuccessful examinee.

(c) Within 45 days following receipt of the audio recording of the examination, a physician who fails the examination may request a hearing before the administrative law judge as designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code to determine whether he or she is entitled to take a second examination.

(d) If the physician timely requests a hearing concerning the right to reexamination under subdivision (c), the hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section
 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon a finding that the examination or procedure is unfair or that one or more of the examiners manifest bias toward the examinee, a reexamination shall be ordered.

(e) If the examinee fails the examination and is not afforded the right to reexamination, the division may take action pursuant to Section 2230 by directing that an accusation be filed charging the examinee with incompetency under subdivision (d) of Section 2234. The modes of discipline are set forth in Sections 2227 and 2228.

(f) Findings and conclusions reported by the examiners may be received in the administrative hearing on the accusation. The passing of the examination shall constitute prima facie evidence of present competence in the area of coverage of the examination.

(g) Competency examinations shall be conducted under a uniform examination system, and for that purpose the division may make arrangements with organizations furnishing examination material as deemed desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2294.

(a) If the division proceeds pursuant to the provisions of Sections 2292 and 2293 and the physician passes the professional competency examination administered, the division shall be precluded from filing an accusation of incompetency based solely on the circumstances giving rise to the reasonable cause for the examination.

(b) If the division determines there is insufficient cause to file an accusation based on the examination results, then all agency records of the proceedings, including the petition and order for the examination, investigative reports, if any, reports
 of staff or outside medical consultants, and the reports of the examiners, shall be kept confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or subpoena.

(c) If no further proceedings are conducted to determine the physician’s fitness to practice during a period of five years from the date of the petition under Section 2292, then the agency shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1070, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2305.

The revocation, suspension, or other discipline, restriction, or limitation imposed by another state upon a license or certificate to practice medicine issued by that state, or the revocation, suspension, or restriction of the authority to practice medicine by any agency of the federal government, that would have been grounds for discipline in California of a licensee under this chapter, shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct against the licensee in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 708, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2306.

If a licensee’s right to practice medicine is suspended, he or she shall not engage in the practice of medicine during the term of such suspension. Upon the expiration of the term of suspension, the certificate shall be reinstated by the Division of Medical Quality, unless the licensee during the term of suspension is found to have engaged in the practice of medicine in this state. In that event, the division shall revoke the licensee’s certificate to engage in the practice of medicine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2307.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (i), a person whose certificate has been surrendered while under investigation or while charges are pending or whose certificate has been revoked or suspended or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation.
